North Dakota statutes. TITLE 39 Motor Vehicles
CHAPTER 39-06 Operators’ Licenses
39-06-33.
Hearings on suspension or revocation.

If an operator’s license is suspended or revoked under section 39-06-32 or 39-06.1-10 or chapter 39-16 or 39-16.1, the director shall give notice of intention to suspend to the licensee by mailing the notice to the licensee at the address of record in the department under section 39-06-20. Actual notice of the opportunity for a hearing under this section must be deemed to have occurred seventy-two hours after the notice is mailed by regular mail. The licensee has ten days after the date of mailing of the notice to request, in writing or by other means authorized by the director, a hearing on the intended suspension or revocation.

Any hearing conducted under this section and any appeal from the decision of the hearing must be conducted under chapter 28-32, except the hearing must be heard within sixty days of the receipt of the request for hearing and in the county of the licensee’s residence, unless the parties agree to a different time and place for the hearing. A hearing under this section may be conducted by telephone, television, virtual online interface, or other electronic means with the consent of the licensee. At the hearing, the regularly kept records of the director may be introduced and are prima facie evidence of their content without further foundation.

The mailing of the decision and the resulting order by regular mail to the address recorded in the files of the director under section 39-06-20 is sufficient notice. If a suspension is ordered, a re-examination of the licensee may be required.

If a suspension is ordered under subdivision b of subsection 1 of section 39-06-32, the notice must include a specific description of the conditions which led to the conclusion that the licensee is incompetent to drive a motor vehicle. If during the suspension those conditions dissipate, the licensee may request another hearing on the issue of competence to drive a motor vehicle. The hearing must be held in the manner required under subsections 2 and 3 for the original suspension.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 251, § 32; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 39-0633; S.L. 1963, ch. 277, § 8; 1967, ch. 292, § 12; 1969, ch. 340, § 7; 1977, ch. 347, § 3; 1981, ch. 385, § 3; 1983, ch. 430, § 1; 1987, ch. 461, § 1; 1991, ch. 394, § 5; 1995, ch. 372, § 4; 2001, ch. 340, § 4; 2013, ch. 291, § 40; 2021, ch. 290, § 1, effective August 1, 2021.

Cross-References.

Verification of liability insurance, see § 39-16.1-20.1.

39-06-33.1.
Authority to suspend licenses after traffic death or injury — Show cause order required. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1987, ch. 460, § 16; S.L. 1987, ch. 461, § 4.

39-06-34.
Director may require reexamination.

In addition to any other power, the director, having good cause to believe that an individual with an operator’s license is incompetent or otherwise not qualified for the operator’s license, may upon written notice of at least five days to the individual require the individual to submit to such physical, mental, or driver’s examination as may be deemed necessary by the director. If the director has good cause to believe that the individual presents an immediate danger to the motoring public, the director may immediately, and without prior notice, suspend the operator’s license of the individual pending the examination. The notice of suspension must provide the individual with the opportunity for a hearing within five days of the receipt of the notice of suspension. When a hearing is requested, the hearing must be conducted under section 39-06-33 and the hearing officer’s recommended decision must be rendered within two days of the conclusion of the hearing. Upon the conclusion of the examination, the director shall take action as may be appropriate and may suspend or revoke the license of the individual or permit the individual to retain the license, or may issue a license subject to restrictions as permitted under section 39-06-17. The director may suspend or revoke the operator’s license of the individual for refusal or neglect of the individual to submit to an examination.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 251, § 33; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 39-0634; S.L. 1989, ch. 462, § 1; 2005, ch. 330, § 2; 2013, ch. 291, § 41.

39-06-34.1.
Court may require reexamination.

In addition to any other powers, the court, upon finding of a moving motor vehicle violation which leads the court to believe an individual with an operator’s license is not qualified for the operator’s license, may direct the director to require the individual to submit to re-examination under section 39-06-13. Written notice of at least five days must be given to the individual by the director of the re-examination. Upon the conclusion of the examination, the director shall take action as may be appropriate and may suspend or revoke the license of the individual or permit the individual to retain the operator’s license, or may issue a license subject to restrictions as permitted under section 39-06-17. The director may suspend or revoke the operator’s license of the individual for refusal or neglect of the individual to submit to the examination.

Source:

S.L. 1975, ch. 336, § 1; 2013, ch. 291, § 42.

39-06-35.
Period of suspension.

After the period of suspension imposed under this title, the operator’s license of an individual that has been suspended remains suspended and may not be returned or reinstated until the individual pays to the director a reinstatement fee as listed in section 39-06-49. If applicable, the operator’s license may not be returned until compliance with subsection 4 of section 39-06.1-10. Upon payment of the reinstatement fee the license must be returned to the individual. If the individual submits payment of the reinstatement fee with a check, credit card, or debit card and the individual stops payment on the transaction, the director shall reimpose the suspension until the director receives proper payment.

A reinstatement fee is not required for a license to be returned to the operator if the return of the license is due to the findings of a hearing, re-examination of hearing, or court or judicial review under chapter 39-06, 39-06.1, or 39-20.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 251, § 34; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 39-0635; S.L. 1975, ch. 341, § 1; 1983, ch. 415, § 9; 1985, ch. 429, § 2; 1993, ch. 375, § 5; 1999, ch. 342, § 1; 2001, ch. 340, § 5; 2011, ch. 271, § 10; 2013, ch. 291, § 43; 2013, ch. 295, § 1.

39-06-36.
Restoration of revoked licenses.

An individual whose operator’s license has been revoked is not entitled to have the operator’s license renewed or restored unless the revocation was for a cause which has been removed, except that after the expiration of the revocation period the individual may make application for a new license, but the director may not then issue a new license unless the director is satisfied after investigation of the individual’s driving records, driving habits, and driving ability of the individual that it will be safe to grant an operator’s license to that individual. An individual whose operator’s license has been revoked must pay to the director a revocation reinstatement fee as listed in section 39-06-49, in addition to any license renewal fee, for issuance of a new license. If the individual submits payment of a reinstatement fee with a check, credit card, or debit card and the individual stops payment on the transaction, the director shall reimpose a suspension until the director receives proper payment. A reinstatement fee is not required if a revoked license is reinstated due to the findings of a hearing, re-examination of hearing, or court or judicial review as provided under chapter 39-06, 39-06.1, or 39-20.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 251, § 35; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 39-0636; S.L. 1977, ch. 347, § 4; 1983, ch. 415, § 10; 1985, ch. 429, § 3; 1993, ch. 375, § 6; 1999, ch. 342, § 2; 2011, ch. 271, § 11; 2013, ch. 291, § 44.

Collateral References.

Validity, construction, application, and effect of statute requiring conditions, in addition to expiration of time, for reinstatement of suspended or revoked driver’s license, 2 A.L.R.5th 725.

39-06-37.
Duration of multiple suspensions and revocations for separate violations.

A suspension, revocation, or cancellation ordered under this title must be deemed to have commenced when the order is delivered to the licensee at the address of record in the department under section 39-06-20. Constructive delivery under this section must be considered as occurring forty-eight hours after the order is mailed to the person by regular mail.

Unless otherwise specifically provided in this title, any suspension, revocation, cancellation, or denial of licensing ordered under this title must be in addition to, and run consecutive to, any other or existing suspension, revocation, cancellation, or denial of licensing ordered for a separate violation.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 251, § 36; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 39-0637; S.L. 1967, ch. 292, § 14; 1975, ch. 341, § 2; 1981, ch. 385, § 4; 1987, ch. 458, § 11; 1987, ch. 462, § 1; 2005, ch. 329, § 3; 2013, ch. 291, § 45; 2017, ch. 265, § 1, effective August 1, 2017.

39-06-38.
No operation under foreign license during suspension or revocation in this state.

Any resident or nonresident whose operator’s license in this state has been suspended or revoked under this title may not operate a motor vehicle in this state under a license, permit, or registration certificate issued by any other jurisdiction or otherwise during the suspension or after the revocation until a new operator’s license is obtained when and as permitted under this title.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 251, § 37; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 39-0638; S.L. 1967, ch. 292, § 15; 1987, ch. 458, § 12; 2013, ch. 291, § 46.

39-06-39.
Review by court. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1987, ch. 461, § 4.

39-06-40.
Unlawful use of license — Penalty.

It is a class B misdemeanor for an individual:

To display or cause or permit to be displayed or have in possession any canceled, revoked, fictitious, or fraudulently altered operator’s license or nondriver photo identification card;

To lend that individual’s operator’s license or nondriver photo identification card to any other individual or knowingly permit the use of that individual’s operator’s license or nondriver photo identification card by another individual;

To display or represent as an individual’s own any operator’s license or nondriver photo identification card not issued to that individual;

To fail or refuse to surrender to the director upon demand any operator’s license or nondriver photo identification card that has been suspended, revoked, or canceled;

To permit any unlawful use of an operator’s license or nondriver photo identification card issued to that individual; or

To use a false or fictitious name in any application for an operator’s license or nondriver photo identification card or to knowingly make a false statement or to conceal a material fact or otherwise commit a fraud in the application.

Within five days of receiving a record of conviction or other satisfactory evidence of the violation of this section, the director shall revoke the individual’s operator’s license or nondriver photo identification card. The director may set the period of revocation, not to exceed six months.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 251, § 39; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 39-0640; S.L. 1967, ch. 292, § 17; 1975, ch. 106, § 430; 1987, ch. 458, §§ 13, 14; 2007, ch. 325, § 1; 2011, ch. 271, § 12; 2013, ch. 291, § 47.

Cross-References.

Suspension of licenses, see § 39-06-32.

39-06-40.1.
Reproducing operator’s license — Penalty.

It is unlawful for an individual to print, photograph, photostat, duplicate, alter, or in any way reproduce any operator’s license, nondriver photo identification card, or facsimile of an operator’s license or card, or to print, photograph, photostat, duplicate, alter, or in any way reproduce any document used in the production of any operator’s license or card or facsimile of an operator’s license or card, in a manner that it would be mistaken for a valid license or document containing valid information, or to display or have in possession any print, photograph, photostat, duplicate, reproduction, or facsimile unless authorized by law.

It is unlawful for an individual to alter in any manner any operator’s license or nondriver photo identification card or to display or have in possession an altered operator’s license or nondriver photo identification card.

An individual violating this section is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

Within five days of receiving a record of conviction or other satisfactory evidence of the violation of this section, the director shall revoke the operator’s license or cancel the nondriver photo identification card of the individual. The director may set the period of revocation, not to exceed six months.

Source:

S.L. 1969, ch. 340, § 9; 1971, ch. 370, § 1; 1975, ch. 106, § 431; 1979, ch. 405, § 7; 1981, ch. 384, § 6; 1987, ch. 458, § 15; 2013, ch. 291, § 48.

39-06-41.
Making false affidavit perjury. [Repealed]

Repealed by omission from this code.

39-06-42.
Penalty for driving while license suspended or revoked — Impoundment of vehicle number plates — Authority of cities.

Except as provided in section 39-06.1-11, an individual who operates a motor vehicle on a highway or on public or private areas to which the public has a right of access for vehicular use in this state while an individual’s operator’s license is suspended or revoked in any jurisdiction is guilty of a class B misdemeanor for the first, second, or third offense within a five-year period. Any subsequent offense within the same five-year period is a class A misdemeanor.

If the suspension or revocation was imposed for violation of section 39-08-01 or equivalent ordinance or was governed by section 39-06-31 or chapter 39-20, the sentence must be at least four consecutive days’ imprisonment and a fine as the court deems proper. The execution of sentence may not be suspended or the imposition of sentence deferred under subsection 3 or 4 of section 12.1-32-02. Forfeiture of bail is not permitted in lieu of the defendant’s personal appearance in open court for arraignment on a charge under this subsection.

A court may dismiss a charge under this section upon motion by the defendant if the defendant’s operator’s license is reinstated within sixty days of the date of the offense and the defendant provides to the court satisfactory evidence of the reinstatement.

In addition to any other punishment imposed, the court may order the number plates of the motor vehicle owned and operated by the offender at the time of the offense to be destroyed by the sheriff. If a period of suspension has been extended under subsection 6 of section 39-06-17, the court may order the number plates to be destroyed under this subsection. The offender shall deliver the number plates to the court without delay at a time certain as ordered by the court following the conviction. The court shall deliver the number plates to the sheriff and notify the department of the order. An offender who does not provide the number plates to the court at the appropriate time is subject to revocation of probation.

A city may authorize, by ordinance, its municipal judge to order destruction of motor vehicle number plates by the office of the police officer that made the arrest in the manner provided in subsection 4.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 251, § 41; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 39-0642; S.L. 1975, ch. 106, § 432; 1975, ch. 344, § 1; 1977, ch. 350, § 1; 1983, ch. 415, § 11; 1985, ch. 429, § 4; 1989, ch. 158, § 12; 1991, ch. 413, § 1; 1997, ch. 335, § 1; 2005, ch. 330, § 3; 2013, ch. 291, § 49; 2013, ch. 292, § 2; 2013, ch. 294, § 1.

39-06-43.
Extension of license suspension or revocation.

The director upon receiving a record of the conviction of an individual upon a charge of driving a vehicle while the operator’s license of the individual was suspended shall extend the period of that suspension for an additional:

Like period not to exceed ninety days if the operator’s record for the three years preceding the most recent violation of section 39-06-42 or equivalent ordinance shows the individual’s operator’s license or privilege has not been suspended, revoked, or denied for a prior violation of section 39-06-42 or equivalent ordinance;

One hundred eighty days if the operator’s record for the three years preceding the most recent violation of section 39-06-42 or equivalent ordinance shows the individual’s operator’s license or privilege has been once suspended, revoked, or denied for a prior violation of section 39-06-42 or equivalent ordinance; or

One year if the operator’s record for the three-year period preceding the most recent violation of section 39-06-42 or equivalent ordinance shows the individual’s operator’s license or privilege has been at least twice suspended, revoked, or denied for a prior violation of section 39-06-42 or equivalent ordinance.

If the original suspension was imposed for violation of section 39-08-01 or equivalent ordinance, the director shall extend the period of that suspension for at least six months. If the suspension of the operator’s license resulted solely from failure to appear in court or to post and forfeit bond on noncriminal traffic violations, there may be no additional period of suspension. Suspension periods for failure to appear or to post and forfeit bond on noncriminal traffic violations may be for an indefinite duration. If the conviction was upon a charge of driving while an operator’s license was revoked, the director may not issue a new operator’s license for an additional period of one year from and after the date the individual would otherwise have been entitled to apply for a new license. Upon a conviction of an individual for violating a restricted license issued under section 39-06.1-11 and in which the underlying suspension was imposed for violating section 39-08-01 or equivalent ordinance or is governed by chapter 39-20, the director shall extend the period of the underlying suspension in accordance with subsection 6 of section 39-06-17.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 251, § 42; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 39-0643; S.L. 1969, ch. 340, § 8; 1981, ch. 387, § 1; 1983, ch. 415, § 12; 1991, ch. 414, § 1; 1991, ch. 415, § 1; 1995, ch. 54, § 27; 2013, ch. 291, § 50.

39-06-44.
Permitting unauthorized minor to drive.

An individual may not cause or knowingly permit the individual’s minor child or ward to operate a motor vehicle upon any highway if the minor is not authorized under this chapter or in violation of this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 251, § 43; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 39-0644; 2013, ch. 291, § 51.

39-06-45.
Permitting unauthorized individual to drive.

An individual may not authorize or knowingly permit a motor vehicle owned by the individual or under the individual’s control to be operated upon any highway by any individual who is not authorized under this chapter or in violation of this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 251, § 44; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 39-0645; 2013, ch. 291, § 52.

39-06-46.
Renting motor vehicles — License of renter.

A person may not rent a motor vehicle to an individual unless the individual has an operator’s license or, in the case of a nonresident, the individual has an operator’s license under the laws of the state or country of the nonresident’s residence except a nonresident whose home state or country does not require that an operator be licensed, or unless the renter certifies that the vehicle will be driven by an individual with an operator’s license.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 251, § 45; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 39-0646; 2013, ch. 291, § 53.

Collateral References.

State regulation of motor vehicle rental (“you-drive”) business, 60 A.L.R.4th 784.

39-06-47.
Renting motor vehicle — License inspection.

A person may not rent a motor vehicle to another individual until the lessor has inspected the operator’s license of the individual to whom the vehicle is to be rented, or of the individual by whom the vehicle shall be driven, and compared and verified the signature on the operator’s license with the signature of the individual written in the lessor’s presence.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 251, § 46; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 39-0647; 2013, ch. 291, § 54.

Collateral References.

State regulation of motor vehicle rental (“you-drive”) business, 60 A.L.R.4th 784.

39-06-48.
Renting motor vehicle — Records.

A person renting a motor vehicle to another person shall keep a record of the registration number of the motor vehicle so rented, the name and address of the lessee to whom the vehicle is rented, the number of the license of the lessee or the lessee’s certified driver, and the date and place when and where said license was issued. This record must be open to inspection by any police officer or the director.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 251, § 47; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 39-0648; 2013, ch. 291, § 55.

Collateral References.

State regulation of motor vehicle rental (“you-drive”) business, 60 A.L.R.4th 784.

39-06-49.
Fees — Deposit in state highway fund.

All money received under this chapter must be paid monthly into the highway fund in the state treasury.

The fee for:

An application for a nondriver photo identification card is eight dollars.

Written testing for an application for an operator’s license is five dollars.

Online written testing for an application for an operator’s license is ten dollars.

Actual ability testing for an application for an operator’s license is five dollars.

An application for an operator’s license is fifteen dollars.

An application for a motorized bicycle operator’s permit is ten dollars.

A substitute operator’s license is eight dollars unless the substitute is for erroneous information due to a change in name or address, then the fee is three dollars.

An operator’s license renewal is fifteen dollars.

Reinstatement after suspension is fifty dollars unless the suspension was the result of a suspension under subsection 3, 4, or 6 of section 39-06-03 or subdivision b of subsection 1 of section 39-06-32, then the fee is twenty-five dollars, or unless the suspension was a result of a violation under section 39-08-01 or chapter 39-20, then the fee is one hundred dollars.

Reinstatement after revocation is fifty dollars, unless the revocation was imposed for a violation of subsection 6 of section 39-06-17 or section 39-06-31, 39-06-43, or 39-20-04, then the fee is one hundred dollars.

Any application for which there is a fee must be accompanied by the proper fee.

Source:

S.L. 1955, ch. 251, § 50; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 39-0649; S.L. 1975, ch. 337, § 1; 2013, ch. 291, § 56; 2015, ch. 268, § 5, effective April 15, 2015; 2021, ch. 287, § 3, effective July 1, 2021.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 5 of chapter 268, S.L. 2015 became effective April 15, 2015, pursuant to an emergency clause in section 15 of chapter 268, S.L. 2015.

39-06-50.
Short title. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 291, § 62.

Effective Date.

The repeal of this section by section 62 of chapter 291, S.L. 2013 became effective July 1, 2013.

39-06-51.
License to carry warnings and convictions. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1975, ch. 338, § 1.

39-06-52.
Veteran indicator on license. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 291, § 62.